California, session 20252026, AB1110.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6328 of the Labor Code is amended to read:6328. (a) The division shall prepare a notice containing pertinent information regarding safety rules and regulations. The notice shall contain the address and telephone number address, all of the following:(1) The address, telephone number, and email address of the nearest division office; a office.(2) A clear explanation of an employee’s right to report any unsafe working conditions; the conditions.(3) The right to request a safety inspection by the division for unsafe conditions; the conditions.(4) The right to refuse to work under conditions which endanger his that endanger an employee’s life or health; the health.(5) The right to receive information under the Hazardous Substances Information and Training Act (Ch. 2.5 (commencing with Section 6360)); posting Section 6360)).(6) Posting and notice requirements of employers and the division; and any division.(7) Any other information the division deems necessary. It(b) The notice shall be supplied to employers as soon as practical. The division shall promulgate regulations on the content and the required location and number of notices which that must be posted by employers. Sufficient posters in both English and Spanish shall be printed to supply employers in this state.SECTION 1.Section 253 of the Labor Code is amended to read:253.The Labor Commissioner shall hear and decide all wage disputes arising in connection with seasonal labor and shall allow or reject any deductions made from those wages. The commissioner shall reject all deductions made for gambling and liquor debts incurred by the employee during their employment.